ru: Размер гитары: 1/2; 1/4; 3/4; Концерт; Полноразмерный; Джамбо; Parlor; Короткая мензура; Другое
tr: Gitar boyutu: 1/2; 1/4; 3/4; Konser; Tam boyutlu; Jumbo; Salon; Kısa ölçek; Diğer
th: ขนาดกีตาร์: 1/2; 1/4; 3/4; คอนเสิร์ต; ขนาดมาตรฐาน; จัมโบ้; พาร์เลอร์; สเกลสั้น; อื่นๆ
ko: 기타 크기: 1/2; 1/4; 3/4; 콘서트; 풀사이즈; 점보; 팔러; 숏스케일; 기타
da: Guitarstørrelse: 1/2; 1/4; 3/4; Koncert; Fuld størrelse; Jumbo; Parlor; Kort skala; Andet
el: Μέγεθος κιθάρας: 1/2; 1/4; 3/4; Συναυλία; Πλήρους μεγέθους; Jumbo; Parlor; Μικρής κλίμακας; Άλλο
zh-CN: 吉他尺寸: 1/2; 1/4; 3/4; 音乐会; 全尺寸; 特大; 旅行吉他; 短颈; 其他
en: Guitar size: 1/2; 1/4; 3/4; Concert; Full size; Jumbo; Parlor; Short scale; Other
pt-BR: Tamanho da guitarra: 1/2; 1/4; 3/4; Concerto; Tamanho real; Jumbo; Salão; Escala curta; Outro
bg-BG: Размер на китара: 1/2; 1/4; 3/4; Концертна; Пълен размер; Джъмбо; Салон; Къса скала; Други
lt-LT: Gitaros dydis: 1/2; 1/4; 3/4; Koncertinė; Įprasto dydžio; „Jumbo“; Akustinė; Trumpoji; Kita
it: Misura della chitarra: 1/2; 1/4; 3/4; Concerto; Dimensione piena; Jumbo; Parlor; Scala corta; Altro
vi: Cỡ đàn guitar: 1/2; 1/4; 3/4; Buổi biểu diễn âm nhạc; Cỡ chuẩn; Jumbo; Cỡ nhỏ; Cỡ ngắn; Khác
pt-PT: Tamanho da guitarra: 1/2; 1/4; 3/4; Concerto; Tamanho completo; Jumbo; Parlor; Escala curta; Outro
ro-RO: Dimensiune chitară: 1/2; 1/4; 3/4; Concert; Dimensiune completă; Jumbo; Parlor; Scară scurtă; Altele
sk-SK: Veľkosť gitary: 1/2; 1/4; 3/4; Koncert; Plná veľkosť; Jumbo; Parlor; Shortscale (3/4 veľkosť); Iné
nb: Gitarstørrelse: 1/2; 1/4; 3/4; Konsert; Full størrelse; Jumbo; Salong; Kortskala; Annet
de: Gitarrengröße: 1/2; 1/4; 3/4; Konzert; Volle Größe; Jumbo; Parlor; Shortscale; Sonstiges
es: Tamaño de la guitarra: 1/2; 1/4; 3/4; Concierto; Tamaño completo; Jumbo; Parlor; Escala corta; Otros
ja: ギターのサイズ: 1/2; 1/4; 3/4; コンサート; フルサイズ; ジャンボ; パーラー; ショートスケール; その他
fr: Taille de la guitare: 1/2; 1/4; 3/4; Concert; Taille réelle; Jumbo; Parlor; Taille courte; Autre
hu: Gitár mérete: 1/2; 1/4; 3/4; Koncert; Teljes méret; Jumbo; Parlor; Rövid skálájú; Egyéb
fi: Kitaran koko: 1/2; 1/4; 3/4; Konsertti; Täysikokoinen; Jumbo; Sali; Lyhyt asteikko; Muu
sl-SI: Velikost kitare: 1/2; 1/4; 3/4; Koncertna; Polna velikost; Jumbo; Salonska; Kratki vrat; Drugo
pl: Rozmiar gitary: 1/2; 1/4; 3/4; Koncert; Pełnowymiarowy; Jumbo; Salon; Krótka skala; Inne
zh-TW: 吉他尺寸: 1/2; 1/4; 3/4; 演唱會; 全尺寸; 巨型紗; 客廳; 短音階; 其他
cs: Velikost kytary: 1/2; 1/4; 3/4; Koncert; Plná velikost; Jumbo; Salonní; S krátkou stupnicí; Jiné
nl: Formaat gitaar: 1/2; 1/4; 3/4; Concert; Volledige grootte; Jumbo; Salon; Korte schaal; Andere
hr-HR: Veličina gitare: 1/2; 1/4; 3/4; Koncert; Puna veličina; Jumbo; Parlor; Kratka ljestvica; Ostalo
sv: Gitarrstorlek: 1/2; 1/4; 3/4; Konsert; Fullstorlek; Jumbo; Parlour-gitarr; Kort skala; Övrigt